Louisiana, session 2026, HB447.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 33:2740.70.11 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2740.70.11. The Avondale and Waggaman Economic Development District
A. There is hereby created within the parish of Jefferson, as more
specifically provided in Subsection B of this Section, a body politic and corporate
which shall be known as the Avondale and Waggaman Economic Development
District, referred to in this Section as the "district". The district shall be a political
subdivision of the state as defined in the Constitution of Louisiana.
B. The boundaries of the district shall include the following area: Highway
90 from the St. Charles/St. Bernard parish line to Lapalco Boulevard.
C. The district is created to provide for cooperative economic and
community development among the district, the parish, the state, and the owners of
Page 1 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-847 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 447
property in the district, to enhance the development of and improvement to the
property within the area of the district, to develop stable and more extensive
employment opportunities, to improve infrastructure, and to promote the overall
welfare of the citizens of the district.
D.(1) In order to provide for the orderly development of the district and
effect the purposes of the district, the district shall be administered and governed by
a seven-member board of commissioners, referred to in this Section as the "board",
composed as follows:
(a) The Avondale Civic Association shall appoint one member who is a
representative of the association.
(b) The Waggaman Civic Association shall appoint one member who is a
representative of the association.
(c) The S1 Civic Association shall appoint one member who is a
representative of the association.
(d) The Kennedy Heights Civic Association shall appoint one member who
is a representative of the association.
(e) The member of the Louisiana Senate whose district encompasses all or
the greater portion of the area of the district or his designee.
(f) The member of the Louisiana House of Representatives whose district
encompasses all or the greater portion of the area of the district or his designee.
(g) The member of the governing authority of the parish of Jefferson who
represents District No. 3 or his designee.
(2)(a) The members serving pursuant to Subparagraphs (1)(a) through (d) of
this Subsection shall serve four-year terms after serving initial terms as provided in
this Subparagraph. One member shall serve an initial term of one year; one shall
serve two years; one shall serve three years; and one shall serve four years, as
determined by lot at the first meeting of the board.
Page 2 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-847 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 447
(b) The members serving pursuant to Subparagraphs(1)(e) through (g) of this
Subsection shall serve during their terms of office. Any designee shall serve at the
pleasure of the designating authority.
(3) Any vacancy which occurs prior to the expiration of the term for which
a member of the board has been appointed shall be filled by appointment in the same
manner as the original appointment for the unexpired term.
(4) The board shall elect from its members a chairman, a vice chairman, a
secretary-treasurer, and other officers as it deems necessary. The duties of the
officers shall be fixed by the bylaws adopted by the board.
(5) The minute books and archives of the district shall be maintained by the
secretary-treasurer of the board. The monies, funds, and accounts of the district shall
be in the official custody of the board.
(6) The board shall adopt rules and regulations as it deems necessary or
advisable for conducting its business affairs. Rules and regulations of the board
relative to the notice and conduct of meetings shall conform to applicable law. The
board shall hold regular meetings as provided for in the bylaws and may hold special
meetings at such times and places within the district as prescribed in the bylaws.
(7) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum for the
transaction of business. The board shall keep minutes of all meetings and shall make
them available through the secretary-treasurer of the board.
(8) The members of the board shall serve without compensation but shall be
reimbursed for reasonable out-of-pocket expenses directly related to the governance
of the district.
E.(1) The district, acting by and through its board, shall have and exercise
all powers of a political subdivision necessary or convenient for carrying out its
objects and purposes, including but not limited to the following:
(a) To sue and to be sued.
(b) To adopt, use, and alter at will a corporate seal.
(c) To adopt bylaws and rules and regulations.
Page 3 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-847 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 447
(d) To receive by gift, grant, or donation any sum of money, property, aid,
or assistance from the United States, the state of Louisiana, or any political
subdivision thereof, or any person, firm, or corporation.
(e) To enter into contracts, agreements, or cooperative endeavors with the
state and its political subdivisions or political corporations and with any public or
private association, corporation, business entity, or individual.
(f) To appoint officers, agents, and employees; prescribe their duties; and fix
their compensation.
(g) To acquire by purchase, gift, grant, donation, or lease property as may
be necessary or desirable for carrying out the objectives and purposes of the board.
(h) To perform any other necessary and ancillary acts to effectuate its
functions, to perform its duties, or to give effect to its powers in accordance with this
Section.
(2) The district shall have no power of taxation.
F.(1) The board shall prepare or cause to be prepared a plan or plans
specifying the public improvements, facilities, and services proposed to be furnished,
constructed, or acquired for the district and shall conduct public hearings, publish
notice with respect thereto, and disseminate information as it, in the exercise of its
sound discretion, deems appropriate or advisable and in the public interest.
(2) Any plan may specify and encompass any public services, capital
improvements, and facilities which the parish of Jefferson is authorized to undertake,
furnish, or provide under the constitution and laws of the state of Louisiana, and the
specified public services, improvements, and facilities shall be special and in
addition to all services, improvements, and facilities which the parish is then
furnishing or providing or may then or in the future be obligated to furnish or
provide within the district.
(3) Any plan shall include an estimate of the annual and total cost of
acquiring, constructing, or providing the services, improvements, or facilities set
forth therein.
Page 4 of 6
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-847 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 447
G. Budget. (1) The board shall adopt an annual budget in accordance with
the Louisiana Local Government Budget Act, R.S. 39:1301 et seq.
(2) The district shall be subject to audit by the legislative auditor pursuant
to R.S. 24:513.
H. All state officers and agencies are authorized at their discretion to render
such services to the district within their respective functions as may be requested by
the district. In addition, the district and such agencies are authorized to enter into
such contracts, cooperative endeavor agreements, or other agreements necessary or
convenient to carry out the purposes of this Section.